Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

Jurisdiction and Powers

16-11-101. General powers.

The chancery court has all the powers, privileges and jurisdiction properly and rightfully incident to a court of equity.

Code 1858, § 4279 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 1); Shan., § 6088; mod. Code 1932, § 10349; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-601.

Cross-References. Banking commissioner's orders, jurisdiction of chancery courts to enforce, § 45-1-108.

Personal injury or death cases in chancery or circuit courts, reports, § 16-21-111.

Probate jurisdiction transferred from county court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

State system of personnel administration, title 8, ch. 30.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 1.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 832.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 21, 33, 55.

Law Reviews.

Abolishing Local Action Rules: A First Step toward Modernizing Jurisdiction and Venue in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 251 (2004).

Casenote: Estate, Gift and Trust Law-Joint and Mutual Wills-Proper Jurisdictional Vehicles for Contract-Based Mutual Wills Claims, 80 Tenn. L. Rev. 883 (2013). A Little Bit of Laches Goes a Long Way: Notes on Petrella v. Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc., 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 1 (2014).

Domestic Relations — Inherent Annulment Jurisdiction of Equity Court, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 1063.

Equity — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (T. A. Smedley), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 896.

Justiciability in Tennessee, Part Three: Timing (Barbara Kritchevsky), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 177 (1986).

Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

Quiet Title Actions in Tennessee, 15 Mem. St. U.S. Rev. 263 (1985).

The Chancery Court, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 245.

The Supreme Court and the New Equity, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 997 (2015).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Comparative Legislation. Chancery courts:

Ark. Code § 16-13-301 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 9-5-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 8.01-607 et seq.

Cited: Carter v. Taylor, 409 F. Supp. 1162, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16018 (E.D. Tenn. 1975); Knobler v. Knobler, 697 S.W.2d 583, 1985 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2715 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1985); Brandon v. Wright, 838 S.W.2d 532, 1992 Tenn. App. LEXIS 365 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1992); City of Jackson v. State, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 318 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 27, 2008); Cheatham County v. Kong, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 405 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 30, 2009).

16-11-102. Jurisdiction of civil causes — Transfer to circuit court.

The chancery court has concurrent jurisdiction, with the circuit court, of all civil causes of action, triable in the circuit court, except for unliquidated damages for injuries to person or character, and except for unliquidated damages for injuries to property not resulting from a breach of oral or written contract; and no demurrer for want of jurisdiction of the cause of action shall be sustained in the chancery court, except in the cases excepted.

Any suit in the nature of the cases excepted in subsection (a) brought in the chancery court, where objection has not been taken by a plea to the jurisdiction, may be transferred to the circuit court of the county, or heard and determined by the chancery court upon the principles of a court of law.

Acts 1877, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; 1915, ch. 47; Shan., § 6109; mod. Code 1932, § 10377; Acts 1977, ch. 294, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-602.

Cross-References. Probate jurisdiction transferred from county court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 4, 8, 14, 56, 105, 504, 576.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Actions, § 2; 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 38; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 212, 251; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 136; 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 70; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 12; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 15, 21, 25-29, 32-36, 94, 100; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraud and Deceit, § 36; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 41; 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, §§ 4, 5; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recovery of Personal Property, § 23.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Flowers v. Dyer County: The Death of the Motion to Dismiss for Lack of Subject Matter Jurisdiction, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 409 (1993).

Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

Cited: Shipp v. McLean, 54 S.W. 669, 1899 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 125 (1899); Davis v. Parks, 151 Tenn. 321, 270 S.W. 444, 1924 Tenn. LEXIS 67 (1924); State ex rel. Thompson v. Dixie Finance Co., 152 Tenn. 306, 278 S.W. 59, 1925 Tenn. LEXIS 74 (1925); Mack v. Hugger Bros. Constr. Co., 10 Tenn. App. 402, — S.W.2d —, 1929 Tenn. App. LEXIS 47 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1929); Campbell v. Lewisburg & N. R. Co., 160 Tenn. 477, 26 S.W.2d 141, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 124 (1930); Morgan v. Layne, 165 Tenn. 513, 56 S.W.2d 161, 1932 Tenn. LEXIS 78 (1933); Owens v. Owens, 21 Tenn. App. 104, 106 S.W.2d 227, 1937 Tenn. App. LEXIS 12 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1937); Bunch v. Allison, 596 S.W.2d 814, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 436 (Tenn. 1980); Duke v. Daniels, 660 S.W.2d 793, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 624 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983); Bill Walker & Associates, Inc. v. Parrish, 770 S.W.2d 764, 1989 Tenn. App. LEXIS 111 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1989); Lee v. Hall, 790 S.W.2d 293, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Logan v. Winstead, 23 S.W.3d 297, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 415 (Tenn. 2000); Joiner v. Carter, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 420 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 27, 2007); Cheatham County v. Kong, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 405 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 30, 2009); Hayes v. State, 341 S.W.3d 293, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 681 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 8, 2009); Young v. Davis, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 728 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 30, 2009); Williams v. City of Milan, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 67 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 16, 2011).

16-11-103. Jurisdiction of equity causes.

The chancery court has exclusive original jurisdiction of all cases of an equitable nature, where the debt or demand exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00), unless otherwise provided by this code. It has no jurisdiction of any debt or demand of less value than fifty dollars ($50.00), unless otherwise specifically provided.

Code 1858, §§ 4280, 4281 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 1); Shan., §§ 6089, 6090; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10350, 10351; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-603.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 5, 8.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 21, 26, 33; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

The Supreme Court and the New Equity, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 997 (2015).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Tinsley v. Bryan, 148 Tenn. 256, 255 S.W. 49, 1922 Tenn. LEXIS 88 (1923); L.L. Bean, Inc. v. Bracey, 817 S.W.2d 292, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 346 (Tenn. 1991).

16-11-104. Proceedings in aid of execution.

The chancery court has exclusive jurisdiction to aid a creditor, by judgment or decree, to subject the property of the defendant that cannot be reached by execution to the satisfaction of the judgment or decree under this code.

Code 1858, § 4282; Shan., § 6091; Code 1932, § 10352; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-604.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 7, 332, 456.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 25-116, 148; 8 Tenn. Juris., Covenants, § 3; 10 Tenn. Juris., Dower, § 7; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 26, 33; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 74; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Cited: Tritschler v. Cartwright, 46 Tenn. App. 662, 333 S.W.2d 6, 1959 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1959); United Nat'l Real Estate v. Thompson, 941 S.W.2d 58, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 634 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996).

16-11-105. Suits by state against corporations.

The court has power to hear and determine all controversies between the state and corporations, their stockholders or creditors, upon a bill filed by the attorney general and reporter on behalf of the state.

Code 1858, § 4296 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 1, § 4); Shan., § 6105; mod. Code 1932, § 10366; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-605.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 7, 506.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 34, 35; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: State ex rel. Collier v. Enloe, 121 Tenn. 347, 117 S.W. 223, 1908 Tenn. LEXIS 24 (1909).

16-11-106. Boundary disputes.

The chancery court has jurisdiction to hear and determine all cases in which the boundary line or lines of adjoining or contiguous tracts of land is one, or the only, question at issue in the case.

In all such cases a complete deraignment of title by the complainant from a state grant or common source of title shall not be required as in ejectment cases, but it shall be sufficient to establish title in the complainant where the complainant proves clearly that the complainant is the true owner of the lands described in the complainant's bill.

Acts 1915, ch. 122, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 6106 a1, 6106 a2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10368, 10369; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 16-606, 16-607.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 7, 121.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 251; 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, §§ 2-22; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 28; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 35; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 45; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Cited: McGregor v. Lehman, 14 Tenn. App. 300, — S.W.2d —, 1931 Tenn. App. LEXIS 40 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1931); Ray v. Crain, 18 Tenn. App. 603, 80 S.W.2d 113, 1934 Tenn. App. LEXIS 61 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1934); Stearns Coal & Lumber Co. v. Kitchen Lumber Co., 27 Tenn. App. 468, 182 S.W.2d 4, 1944 Tenn. App. LEXIS 93 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1944); Gibson v. Shular, 29 Tenn. App. 166, 194 S.W.2d 865, 1946 Tenn. App. LEXIS 63 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1946); Carr v. Wilbanks, 45 Tenn. App. 372, 324 S.W.2d 786, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 131 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958); Arrowood v. Williams, 586 S.W.2d 131, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 331 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979); Hodges v. Huntington, 595 S.W.2d 824, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 383 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979); Bynum v. Hollowell, 656 S.W.2d 400, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 602 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983).

16-11-107. Suits on foreign judgments.

When a judgment has been recovered in any other state against a resident of such state, and the creditor has exhausted the creditor's legal remedy, the real or personal property of the debtor in this state may be subjected to the satisfaction of such debt, by bill stating the facts under oath, and filed in the court of the county in which the property is situated.

Code 1858, § 4297 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 2); Shan., § 6106; Code 1932, § 10367; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-608.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 4, 76, 114; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 4; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 102; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Cited: Thornburg v. Chase, 606 S.W.2d 672, 1980 Tenn. App. LEXIS 384 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1980); Barone v. Barone, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 218 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 3, 2012).

16-11-108. Persons adjudicated incompetent.

The chancery court has jurisdiction, concurrent with the county court, over persons adjudicated incompetent and their estates.

Code 1858, § 4298 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 163, § 1); Shan., § 6107; Code 1932, § 10375; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-609; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “persons adjudicated incompetent and their estates” for “the persons and estates of idiots, lunatics, and other persons of unsound mind” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

Cross-References. Personal service on incompetents, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04(2).

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 62.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 30; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 4; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Tinsley v. Bryan, 148 Tenn. 256, 255 S.W. 49, 1922 Tenn. LEXIS 88 (1923); Brewer v. Griggs, 10 Tenn. App. 378, — S.W.2d —, 1929 Tenn. App. LEXIS 46 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1929).

16-11-109. Infants and guardians.

The chancery court has jurisdiction, concurrent with the county court, of the persons and estates of infants, and of the appointment and removal of guardians.

Code 1858, § 4299; Shan., § 6108; Code 1932, § 10376; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-610.

Cross-References. Concurrent jurisdiction with county and juvenile courts, §§ 34-2-101, 37-1-104.

Guardianship, title 34.

Personal service on infants, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04(2).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 30; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 23.

Law Reviews.

A Study of Domestic Relations, Juvenile and Family Courts in Tennessee, 10 Vand. L. Rev. 592.

Cited: Kansas City, Ft. S. & M. R. Co. v. Morgan, 76 F. 429, 1896 U.S. App. LEXIS 2142 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1896); Dick v. Dick, 223 Tenn. 228, 443 S.W.2d 472, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 407 (1969); Cockrell v. Woods, 528 S.W.2d 206, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 624 (Tenn. 1975); Wilson v. Grantham, 739 S.W.2d 776, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3505 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986).

16-11-110. Divorce proceedings — Adoptions.

The chancery court has jurisdiction, concurrent with the circuit court, of all proceedings for divorce and for the adoption of children.

Code 1858, § 4301 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 1); Shan., § 6111; Code 1932, § 10379; Acts 1951, ch. 202, § 2 (Williams, § 9572.16); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-612.

Cross-References. Adoption, title 36, ch. 1.

Custody, title 36, ch. 6.

Divorce and annulment, title 36, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 8.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Divorce and Alimony, §§ 2, 18; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

A Study of Domestic Relations, Juvenile and Family Courts in Tennessee, 10 Vand. L. Rev. 592.

Courts, Legislatures, and Second-Parent Adoptions: On Judicial Deference, Specious Reasoning, and the Best Interests of the Child, 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 019 (1999).

Cited: Rains v. Rains, 58 Tenn. App. 214, 428 S.W.2d 650, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 295 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Sizemore v. Sizemore, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 486 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 30, 2007); In re Angela E., 303 S.W.3d 240, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 87 (Tenn. Feb. 16, 2010).

16-11-111. Partition or sale of property.

The chancery court has jurisdiction, concurrent with the circuit and county courts, of proceedings for the partition or sale of estates by personal representatives, guardians, heirs, or tenants in common, and for the sale of land at the instance of creditors of the decedent, if the personal property is insufficient to satisfy the debts of the estate.

Code 1858, § 4302 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 17; 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 1); Shan., § 6112; mod. Code 1932, § 10380; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-613.

Cross-References. Distribution, partition, and sale of realty, § 16-16-108.

Partition and sale of property, § 16-10-109.

Partition, remedies and special proceedings, title 29, ch. 27.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 124; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 28, 30; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 8.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Bashaw v. Temple, 115 Tenn. 596, 91 S.W. 202, 1905 Tenn. LEXIS 93 (1906); Puckett v. Wynns, 132 Tenn. 513, 178 S.W. 1184, 1915 Tenn. LEXIS 41 (1915); Summers v. Conger, 43 Tenn. App. 286, 307 S.W.2d 936, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 116 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957); Dick v. Dick, 223 Tenn. 228, 443 S.W.2d 472, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 407 (1969).

16-11-112. Arbitration and agreed cases.

The chancery court has jurisdiction, concurrent with all other judicial tribunals, of arbitration and agreed cases under this code.

Code 1858, § 4303 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 173, § 1); Shan., § 6113; Code 1932, § 10381; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-614.

Cross-References. Arbitration, remedies and special proceedings, title 29, ch. 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Collateral References. 6 C.J.S. Arbitration §§ 11, 145-148, 159-160; 21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 11, 490.

16-11-113. Appointment of administrator.

The chancery court may appoint an administrator of a decedent's estate six (6) months after the decedent's death, where no person can be procured to administer in the usual way, as provided in title 30, chapter 3.

Code 1858, § 4304 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 6114; Code 1932, § 10382; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-615.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 30, 35; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction § 23.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Dick v. Dick, 223 Tenn. 228, 443 S.W.2d 472, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 407 (1969).

16-11-114. Venue of suits.

The local jurisdiction of the chancery court is subject to the following rules:

All bills filed in any court seeking to divest or clear the title to land, or to enforce the specific execution of contracts relating to realty, or to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust by a sale of personal property or realty, shall be filed in the county in which the land, or a material part of it, lies, or in which the deed or mortgage is registered;

Bills seeking to enjoin proceedings at law may be filed in the county in which the suit is pending, or to which execution has issued;

Bills against nonresidents, or persons whose names or residences are unknown, may be filed in the county in which the cause of action arose, or the act on which the suit is predicated was to be performed, or in which is the subject of the suit, or any material part thereof; and

When attachment of property is allowed in lieu of personal service of process, the bill may be filed in the county in which the property, or any material part of the property sought to be attached, is found at the commencement of the suit.

Code 1858, § 4311 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1; 1801, ch. 6, § 2; 1825, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; 1827, ch. 42, § 1; 1833, ch. 52); Acts 1877, ch. 107, § 1; Shan., § 6121; Code 1932, § 10388; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-617; Acts 1994, ch. 560, § 1.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 76, 86; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 27, 47; 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, § 25; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 11; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 66; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Real Property (Herman L. Trautman), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1080.

Cited: Gregory v. Merchants State Bank, 23 Tenn. App. 567, 135 S.W.2d 465, 1939 Tenn. App. LEXIS 63 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1939); Terrell v. Terrell, 192 Tenn. 317, 241 S.W.2d 411, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 407 (1951); Martin v. Martin, 755 S.W.2d 793, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 18 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988); Phillips v. State Bd. of Regents, 771 S.W.2d 410, 1989 Tenn. LEXIS 191 (Tenn. 1989); Woods v. Fields, 798 S.W.2d 239, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 216 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Hawkins v. Tenn. Dep't of Corr., 127 S.W.3d 749, 2002 Tenn. App. LEXIS 536 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2002); Haggard v. Aguilar, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 760 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 7, 2010).

16-11-115. Jurisdiction of contract enforcement.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, contracts for goods or services between individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations, governmental entities or limited liability companies are enforceable in either chancery or circuit court in the county where:

The defendant may be found;

The contract was executed;

The goods were provided or were to be provided; or

Services were rendered or were to be rendered.

Acts 2007, ch. 351, § 2.